Oklahoma, session 2025, SB898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 61 O.S. 2021, Section 108, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 108. Each bidder shall accompany the bid with a written
statement under oath disclosing the following information:
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 898 Page 1

1. The nature of any partnership, joint venture or other
business relationships then in effect or which existed within one
(1) year prior to the date of such statement with the architect,
engineer or other party to the project;
2. Any such business relationship then in effect or which
existed within one (1) year prior to the date of such statement
between any officer or director of the bidding company and any
officer or director of the architectural or engineering firm or
other party to the project; and
3. The names of all persons having any such business
relationships and the positions they hold with their respective
companies or firms. If none of the business relationships
hereinabove mentioned exist, then a statement to that effect.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval."







ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 898 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 1st day of May, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House of
Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate















ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 898 Page 3

ENGR OSSED SENATE
BILL NO. 898 By: Pugh of the Senate

and

Gise of the House


[ construction by political subdivisions - written
statements -
emergency ]


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 61 O.S. 2021, Section 108, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 108. Each bidder shall accompany the bid with a written
statement under oath disclosing the following information:
1. The nature of any partnership, joint venture or other
business relationships then in effect or which existed within one
(1) year prior to the date of such statement with the architect,
engineer or other party to the project;
2. Any such business relationship then in effect or which
existed within one (1) year prior to the date of such statement
between any officer or director of the bidding company and any
officer or director of the architectural or engineering firm or
other party to the project; and

ENGR. S. B. NO. 898 Page 1

3. The names of all persons having any such business
relationships and the positions they hold with their respective
companies or firms. If none of the business relationships
hereinabove mentioned exist, then a statement to that effect.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
Passed the Senate the 27th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives







ENGR. S. B. NO. 898 Page 2